Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3885
Diversification.

A trustee shall diversify the investments of the trust unless the trustee reasonably determines that, because of special circumstances, the purposes of the trust are better served without diversifying.

Laws 1997, LB 54, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1997), § 8-2204;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 85.